Utah statutes.
73-18-21.   Violation of chapter as class B misdemeanor.

Unless otherwise specified, any person who violates any provision of this chapter or rule promulgated under this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 99, 1987 General Session

